tests/runtime/setlimit.sbl
// Test setlimit
externals (stem)
routines (setlimit_tomark)

define stem as (
  setlimit_tomark
  ='ok'
)

define setlimit_tomark as (
  // Regression test for bug fixed in 3.1.0.
  test (
    ='abcd'
    next
    // Forwards `setlimit tomark` restored limit incorrectly.
    setlimit tomark 3 for $(limit == 3) or fail='setlimit tomark set wrong limit'
    $(cursor == 1) or fail='cursor changed after setlimit tomark'
    $(limit == 4) or fail='limit not restored after setlimit tomark'
    // Make sure restoring of limit copes with setting the limit to itself!
    setlimit tomark limit for $(limit == 4) or fail='setlimit tomark limit set wrong limit'
    $(cursor == 1) or fail='cursor changed after setlimit tomark'
    $(limit == 4) or fail='limit not restored after setlimit tomark'
  )
)
